Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201614-364
Paving repair plant; establishment; cost of operation; payment.

The city council may establish and maintain a paving repair plant and may pave or repair paving. The cost of such repairs may be paid from the funds of the city or may be assessed upon the abutting property, except that the cost may be assessed against abutting property only following the creation of a paving repair or repaving district established and assessed as a special assessment in the same manner provided for a sprinkling or armor-coating district by section 14-363. The assessable paving repairs shall be only those made with asphaltic concrete on streets in previously developed areas which were not constructed to city permanent design standards.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. III, § 55, p. 456;

C.S.1922, § 3608;

C.S.1929, § 14-356;

R.S.1943, § 14-364;

Laws 1991, LB 745, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 3.